Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB214.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 246.055 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Department of Agriculture may accept federal aid, nonfederal funds and grants, gifts, donations, or
devises[. The Department of Agriculture is authorized in its discretion to accept the provisions of any Act of
Congress appropriating, granting, or apportioning funds or commodities to the state for use in connection with
any program of the Department of Agriculture. The Commissioner shall prescribe for the proper
apportionment and distribution of these funds, property or commodities in accordance with the state and
federal laws].
(2) For use in connection with any program of the department and for the benefit of programs under its control
and supervision, the department is authorized to do any of the following:
(a) Accept provisions of any Act of Congress appropriating, granting, or apportioning funds or
commodities to the state;
(b) Receive funds appropriated by the General Assembly, or from any other source identified in
subsection (1) of this section;
(c) Provide for the proper apportionment and disbursement of such funds in accordance with state or
federal laws; or
(d) Accept and provide for the administration of any nonfederal funds or grants, gifts, donations, or
devises from any source public or private.
(3)[(2)] The Commissioner of Agriculture may enter into any agreement and carry out the terms of such
agreement with any department of the federal government, or state or local public agency, to handle funds,
commodities or any devise under any program assigned to or handled by the Department of Agriculture.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 247 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Extension service" includes the University of Kentucky Cooperative Extension Service or the
Kentucky State University Cooperative Extension Service;
(b) "Initiative" means the Kentucky Urban Youth Agriculture Initiative established in this section;
(c) "Program" means any educational program that is part of the initiative; and
(d) "Urban county" means a county with a population of one hundred fifty thousand (150,000) or more
according to the most recent federal decennial census.
(2) There is hereby established the Kentucky Urban Youth Agriculture Initiative, which shall be administered
by the University of Kentucky Cooperative Extension Service and the Kentucky State University Cooperative
Extension Service and their individual offices within the Commonwealth in partnership with other
organizations as appropriate. Beginning January 1, 2027, the extension service shall initiate a pilot
program in one (1) or more individual offices. Beginning September 1, 2027, and as funding allows, the
extension service may begin full implementation and evaluation of the pilot program in all appropriate
offices throughout the Commonwealth, with potential program scaling and expansion to begin September 1,
2028.
(3) The initiative shall:
(a) Promote farming, agriculture, agribusiness, and the efficient use of land in urban counties;
(b) Educate program participants on all aspects of farming, agriculture, and agribusiness in an urban
environment and encourage the adoption of urban agriculture best practices;
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(c) Develop participants' skills and knowledge to become informed agriculture consumers and
advocates; and
(d) Advance age-appropriate, experiential, or work-ready agricultural and agribusiness programming,
including formal internships and apprenticeships.
(4) The length of each program term shall be one (1) year and each term shall begin in September on a date
specified by each extension service. Programs shall be available to applicants at each extension service
office located within or serving an urban county of the Commonwealth. An office may work with an
existing state or local agricultural organization to better provide for the administration of a program and
the initiative.
(5) Each extension service office administering a program shall accept and review applications from eligible
applicants. Program participation shall be at the discretion of each office and shall include as many
participants as is practicable on an annual basis. To be eligible to participate in a program, a participant
shall:
(a) Be at least five (5) years of age and no more than eighteen (18) years of age;
(b) Have obtained parent or guardian permission to participate in accordance with the extension
service's youth protection policies; and
(c) Be available to participate in the program for the full duration of the term.
Section 3. Whereas under the Department of Agriculture's current authority, the department is unable to
apply for several available privately funded grants that, if awarded, would greatly impact agriculture in the
Commonwealth, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon its passage and approval by the
Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 17, 2026.